src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
Boden

Bruder, Apfel




























CHECKME





















these are from Apertium








N_MSC_PL-with-umlaut





These nouns were previously given a dummy Abhilfe__n_f to indicate
they tended to be singular -heit, -keit


This new
also in SG Abhilfe__n_f



* LEXICON Abhilfe__n_f  This was used in Apertium as FEM SG-only



























N_F_PL-in-s



























mit Artikel
ohne Artikel











* LEXICON Beamte/r__n_m  Beamter:beamte






























































































N_Neu_PL-in-umlaut-plus-er

N_Msc_PL-in-umlaut-plus-e


N_Msc_PL-in-umlaut



Let's check this out
Is this just H/andelSG__n_m


















the same as K/alb__n_nt




* LEXICON Kapl/an__n_m  Kaplan:kaplan

















same as K/uh__n_f










































THis needs some tending to






































































* LEXICON Absurd/um__n_nt  Absurdum:Absurd

* LEXICON Agend/a__n_f  Agenda:Agend

* LEXICON Alb/um__n_nt  Album:Alb

* LEXICON Algorithm/us__n_m  Algorithmus:Algorithm

* LEXICON Allegr/o__n_nt  Allegro:Allegro

* LEXICON Anan/as__n_f  Ananas:Ananas

* LEXICON Arabisch__n_nt  Arabisch:Arabisch

* LEXICON Arom/a__n_nt   Aroma: Arom

* LEXICON Atla/s__n_m  Atlas:Atla

* LEXICON Ausdr/uck__n_m 


* LEXICON Bab/y__n_nt  Baby:Bab

* LEXICON Bas/is__n_f  Basis:Bas

* LEXICON Bass/o__n_m  Basso:Basso

* LEXICON Bau__n_m 

* LEXICON Bronchiti/s__n_f  Bronchitis:Bronchiti

* LEXICON Business__n_nt 

* LEXICON Unverständnis__n_nt  Kein Mehrzahl


* LEXICON Camp/us__n_m  Campus:Camp

* LEXICON Cell/o__n_nt  Cello:Cello

* LEXICON Cembal/o__n_nt  Cembalo:Cembalo

* LEXICON Chairm/an__n_m  Chairman:Chairman

* LEXICON Charm/e__n_m  Charme:Charm

* LEXICON Cod/ex__n_m  Codex:Cod

* LEXICON Cont/e__n_m  Conte:cont

* LEXICON Corp/us__n_nt  Corpus:corp

* LEXICON Cyberspac/e__n_m  Cyberspace:cyberspac

* LEXICON Dem/os__n_m  Demos:dem

* LEXICON Disk/us__n_m  Diskus:disk

* LEXICON Donn/a__n_f  Donna:donn

* LEXICON Ep/os__n_nt  Epos:ep

* LEXICON Espress/o__n_m  Espresso:espresso

* LEXICON Exam/en__n_nt  Examen:exam

* LEXICON Federvie/h__n_nt  Federvieh:Federvie

* LEXICON Gefolgs/mann__n_m  Gefolgsmann:GEfolgs

* LEXICON Gentlem/an__n_m  Gentleman:Gentleman

* LEXICON Hand/ling__n_nt  Handling

* LEXICON Hero/s__n_m  Heros:Hero

* LEXICON Herz__n_nt 

* LEXICON Johanniter__n_f 


* LEXICON Kakt/us__n_m  Kaktus:Kakt

* LEXICON Kauf/mann__n_m  Kaufmann:Kauf

* LEXICON Klima__n_nt 

* LEXICON Kod/ex__n_m  Kodex:Kod

* LEXICON Kont/o__n_nt  Konto:kont

* LEXICON Kon/us__n_m  Konus:kon

* LEXICON Korp/us__n_nt  Korpus:korp

* LEXICON Kurs/us__n_m  Kursus:kurs

* LEXICON Lad/y__n_f  Lady:lad

* LEXICON Laudatio__n_f 

* LEXICON Le/u__n_m  Leu:le

* LEXICON Lexik/on__n_nt  Lexikon:lexik

* LEXICON Le/x__n_f  Lex:le

* LEXICON Lim/es__n_f  Limes:Lim

* LEXICON Lir/a__n_f  Lira:Lir

* LEXICON Logo/s__n_m  Logos:Logo

* LEXICON Mafios/o__n_m  Mafioso:Mafioso

* LEXICON Mark__n_f 

* LEXICON Matri/x__n_f  Matrix:Matri

* LEXICON M/utter__n_f 

* LEXICON Myth/os__n_m  Mythos:myth

* LEXICON Op/us__n_nt  Opus:op

* LEXICON Paradigm/a__n_nt 

* LEXICON Pat/er__n_m  Pater:pater

* LEXICON Pen/ny__n_m  Penny:Pen

* LEXICON Phalan/x__n_f  Phalanx:Phalan

* LEXICON Piazz/a__n_f  Piazza:Piazz

* LEXICON Plas/tik__n_nt 

* LEXICON Präs/es__n_m  Präses:Präs

* LEXICON Requie/m__n_nt  Requiem:Requie

* LEXICON Re/x__n_m  Rex:re

* LEXICON Ris/iko__n_nt  Risiko:Ris

* LEXICON Rowd/y__n_m  Rowdy:Rowd

* LEXICON Sald/o__n_m  Saldo:saldo

* LEXICON Spektr/um__n_nt  Spektrum:Spektr

* LEXICON Stadi/on__n_nt  Stadion:Stadio

* LEXICON Städteatla/s__n_m  Städteatlas:Städteatla

* LEXICON Tr/opf__n_m 

* LEXICON UFO__n_nt 

* LEXICON Vektor__n_m  Vektor:vektor

* LEXICON Vir/us__n_nt  Virus:Vir

* LEXICON Volum/en__n_nt  Volumen:volum

* LEXICON Walr/oss__n_nt  Walross:walross

* LEXICON Xylophon__n_nt  Xylophon:xylophon


* LEXICON Kirmes__n_f 
















































CHECKME ʼ
CHECKME ʼ




* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-deu/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
